California statutes. Education Code
 attending the adult education program at the same site. For purposes of this subparagraph, a facility that houses an adult education program and a regional occupational center or program or a child care program, or both, is a facility that exclusively houses an adult education program.

(v) Facilities costs for the acquisition of facilities originally acquired by adult education programs, or for the restoration of those facilities, including costs for debt service for the acquisition or restoration of a facility, including the costs of facilities that are used to provide childcare services to the children of the students attending the adult education program at the same site.

(B) For purposes of subparagraph (A), “auditable documentation” means time reports and other contemporaneous records that establish the time that individual employees spend working for the adult education
 program, and the documentation that supports nonpersonnel costs substantiating that the adult education program received the service, supply, or equipment. That documentation shall comply with the documentation requirements set forth in the California School Accounting Manual published pursuant to Section 41010.

(b) If the department and the Department of Finance concur that a school district has violated this section, the Superintendent shall direct that school district to transfer double the amount improperly transferred to the school district’s general fund from that fund to the school district’s Adult Education Fund for the subsequent fiscal year, which amount shall be used for the improvement of the school district’s adult education program. If the school district fails to make that transfer as directed, the Superintendent shall reduce the school district’s regular apportionment determined pursuant to Section 42238.02, as implemented by
 Section 42238.03, by that amount, and that shall be used for improvement of the school district’s adult education program.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section that responsible school district officials be held fully accountable for the accounting and reporting of adult education programs and that minor and inadvertent instances of noncompliance be resolved in a fair and equitable manner to the satisfaction of the Superintendent and the Department of Finance.

(d) The Superintendent, with the approval of the Department of Finance, may waive up to the full transfer amount in subdivision (b) if the Superintendent determines that the noncompliance involved is minor or inadvertent, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 87.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52616.6.

A school district or county superintendent of schools may expend funds allocated to it for the purposes of classes for adults in correctional facilities only for the direct instructional charges of those classes and for related direct and indirect support costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 670, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

52616.18.

(a) Commencing July 1, of each fiscal year, notwithstanding that a school district was not authorized to operate an adult education program pursuant to Section 41976, a school district may apply to the department for initial program approval and funding to begin any adult education programs specified in Section 41976 provided the school district meets both of the following criteria:

(1) The school district did not operate nor claim state apportionment for an adult education program in the prior fiscal year.

(2) The school district has participated in the appropriate local adult education consortium, approved pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section
 84900) of Chapter 5 of Part 50 of Division 7 of Title 3, and the applicable adult education plan approved pursuant to that article for adult education activities and services.

(b) The Superintendent may approve the program funding on the basis of the school district’s documented need for adult education programs. The Superintendent shall issue a program advisory that sets forth the criteria of need that a school district is required to document.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 91.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Advanced Scholastic and Vocational Training Program [52620. - 52621.]

52620.

The governing board of a school district overseeing an adult education program or the governing board of a community college district overseeing a noncredit program may authorize a student pursuing a high school diploma or a high school equivalency certificate, upon recommendation of the administrator of the student’s adult school or noncredit program of attendance, to attend a community college during any session or term as a special part-time student, and the community college district shall be credited or reimbursed pursuant to Section 48802 or 76002, provided that no school district has received reimbursement for the same instructional activity. The intent of this section is to better facilitate streamlined enrollment in colocated credit college courses on adult education and noncredit program sites and to help ensure a
 smoother transition from secondary education to college for adult high school equivalency students by providing them with greater exposure to the collegiate atmosphere.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   (SB 554)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

52621.

(a) For purposes of allowances and apportionments from Section B of the State School Fund, a community college shall be credited with additional units of average daily attendance attributable to the attendance of students at the community college as special part-time students.

(b) The attendance of a high school student
 at a community college as a special part-time or full-time student pursuant to this section is authorized attendance for which the community college shall be credited or reimbursed pursuant to Section 48802 or 76002, provided that no school district has received reimbursement for the same instructional activity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 528, Sec. 1.   (SB 554)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Immigrant Workforce Preparation Act [52651. - 52656.]

52651.

For the purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Board of Governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Community-based organizations” means public nonprofit benefit corporations of demonstrated effectiveness approved by the superintendent to provide educational services to eligible legalized persons.

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(e) “Educational outreach activities” means:

(1) Information transmitted to temporary resident persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States regarding the requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Secs. 1160, 1161, and 1255a), as those requirements existed on the effective date of this chapter, relating to adjustment of resident status, sources of assistance to those persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States obtaining adjustment of resident status, including educational, informational, and referral services, and the rights and responsibilities of those persons and persons lawfully admitted for permanent residence, the identification of health,
 employment, and social services, and the importance of identifying oneself as a temporary resident who is not a citizen or national of the United States to service providers. It does not include client counseling or any other service that would assume responsibility of the person’s application for the adjustment of resident status.

(2) Information provided to newly legalized persons and other immigrants regarding educational opportunities available to them.

(f) “Immigrant” means a person who is a citizen of a country other than the United States and is eligible for education services in California or a naturalized United States citizen who is now residing in California.

(g) “Newly legalized person” means a person who is not
 a citizen or national of the United States who has been granted lawful temporary resident status under Sections 1160, 1161, and 1255a of Title 8 of the United States Code, as those sections exist on the effective date of this chapter. In addition, it means a person who has, after being granted lawful temporary resident status, obtained permanent resident or citizenship status.

(h) “Services provider” means any community-based organization, school district maintaining adult education programs, or community college that has been approved by the superintendent in the 1991–92 fiscal year as eligible to provide educational services to newly legalized persons pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 23.50 of the Budget Act of 1991.

(i) “SLIAG” means the State Legalization
 Impact-Assistance Grants as set forth in Section 204 of the Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986, (Sec. 204, P.L. 99-603), as it exists on the effective date of this chapter.

(j) “Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1068, Sec. 3) by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 19.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Superseded by amendment by Stats. 2017, Ch. 69, only if it becomes operative on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52651.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

(a) “Board of Governors” means the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(b) “Chancellor” means the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(c) “Community-based organizations” means public nonprofit benefit corporations of demonstrated effectiveness approved by the Superintendent to provide educational services to eligible legalized persons.

(d) “Department” means the State Department of Education.

(e) “Educational outreach activities” means:

(1) Information transmitted to temporary resident foreign nationals regarding the requirements of the federal Immigration and Nationality Act of 1986 (8 U.S.C. Secs. 1160, 1161, and 1255a), as those requirements existed on the effective date of this chapter, relating to adjustment of resident status, sources of assistance to those foreign nationals obtaining adjustment of resident status, including educational, informational, and referral services, and the rights and responsibilities of those
 foreign nationals and foreign nationals lawfully admitted for permanent residence, the identification of health, employment, and social services, and the importance of identifying oneself as a temporary resident foreign national to service providers. It does not include client counseling or any other service that would assume responsibility of the foreign national’s application for the adjustment of resident status.

(2) Information provided to newly legalized persons and other immigrants regarding educational opportunities available to them.

(f) “Immigrant” means a person who is a citizen of a country other than the United States and is eligible for education services in California or a naturalized United States citizen who is now residing in California.

(g) “Newly legalized person” means a foreign national who has been granted lawful temporary resident status under Sections 1160, 1161, and 1255a of Title 8 of the United States Code, as those sections existed on the effective date of this
 chapter. In addition, it means a person who has, after being granted lawful temporary resident status, obtained permanent resident or citizenship status.

(h) “Services provider” means any community-based organization, school district maintaining adult education programs, or community college that has been approved by the Superintendent in the 1991–92 fiscal year as eligible to provide educational services to newly legalized persons pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 23.50 of the Budget Act of 1991.

(i) “SLIAG” means the State Legalization Impact-Assistance Grants as set forth in Section 204 of the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act of 1986, (Sec. 204, P.L. 99-603), as it exists on the effective date of this chapter.

(j) “Superintendent” means the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 69, Sec. 6.   (AB 1850)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Operative only if the condition in Sec. 10 of Ch. 69 is satisfied on or before January 20, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

52652.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the students enrolled in classes and courses for immigrants pursuant to this chapter be provided with information written in a language understood by the student on available programs to enable that student to continue education and training through existing courses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1068, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52653.

School districts that receive funding pursuant to Section 52656 shall provide the following:

(a) Classes and courses offered pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41976.

(b) Services that were reimbursable under the provisions of SLIAG in the 1991–92 fiscal year, including, but not limited to, instruction in English as a second language, citizenship, basic skills, and ancillary services such as outreach and counseling.

(c) Services to develop the work and educational skills needed by the immigrant in the workplace, including, but not limited to, the communication, computational, problem solving, and interpersonal
 skills needed to succeed in the workplace.

(d) Services that enable immigrants to access educational services and economic development services available to all Californians.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 97.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

52654.

Community college districts that receive funding for the purposes of this chapter shall provide the following:

(a) Services that were reimbursable under the provision of SLIAG in the 1991–92 fiscal year, including, but not limited to, instruction in English as a second language, citizenship, basic skills, and ancillary services such as outreach counseling, whether provided for credit or noncredit.

(b) Services to develop the work and education skills needed by the immigrant in the workplace, including, but not limited to, the communication, computational, problem solving, and interpersonal skills needed to succeed in the workplace, whether provided for credit or noncredit.

(c) Services that enable immigrants to access educational services and economic development services available to all Californians, whether provided for credit or noncredit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1068, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52655.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the superintendent develop a course of instruction for each level of English as a second language and basic skills instruction leading, respectively, to a Certificate of Proficiency in English as a Second Language, and a Certificate of Proficiency in Basic Skills. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the superintendent establish the level of performance and the measures for granting the certificates for adult schools and community-based organizations and that the Board of Governors establish the level of performance and the measures for granting the certificates for community colleges.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1068, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

52656.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, school districts that received apportionment for extraordinary needs in English as a second language and basic skills from Provision (4) of Schedule (a) of Item 6110-156-001 of the Budget Act of 1991 for the 1991–92 fiscal year shall continue to receive those funds in the school district’s adult block entitlement in the 1992–93 fiscal year, and each fiscal year thereafter.

(b) Commencing in the 1993–94 fiscal year, school districts that receive an apportionment from subdivision (a) shall give priority to eligible immigrants in need of courses pursuant to subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 41976 and Section 52653.

(c) School
 districts are not restricted by this chapter from providing classes for immigrants pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 41976 with other funds for adult education that are available to the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 666, Sec. 98.   (AB 486)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Miscellaneous [52700. - 52770.]



  ARTICLE 1. School Farms [52700. - 52706.]

52700.

The governing board of any school district may, for the purpose of providing practical instruction in agriculture, establish one or more school farms for any one or more of the schools of the district whenever in its judgment it is advisable to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52701.

The cost of purchasing and equipping a school farm and all other costs not met from the receipts of the operation of the farm shall be a charge against the funds of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52702.

The governing board of the district may provide for the general supervision of the farm and the cost of the supervision may be a charge against the funds of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52703.

All moneys received from the sale of produce, livestock and other products of a farm shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the general fund of the district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52704.

The governing board of the school district may, as an alternative to the procedure provided for in Section 52703, establish an account for each such farm established in the district, or for all such farms established by the district, in one or more banks to be known as “The School Farm Account” of (insert name of district) District. If the account is established for one of several farms, it shall be known as “The School Farm Account of (insert name of school) School of (insert name of district) District.” All receipts of the school farm, or farms, derived from the sale of produce, livestock, and other products, may be withdrawn from the general fund in the same manner as other moneys may be withdrawn from funds of the district and deposited in the account for expenditure for the operation and maintenance of the farm, or farms, in accordance with the direction of the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52705.

The governing board may designate an employee or employees of the district to have custody of the account or accounts established under Section 52704, who shall be responsible for the payment into the account or accounts of all moneys received for or to be paid into the account or accounts, and for all expenditures therefrom, subject to such regulations as the governing board may prescribe.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52706.

The governing board may buy feed, livestock, and materials and supplies for a farm and may sell produce, livestock and other products of a farm in accordance with rules and regulations adopted by the board notwithstanding any provision of this code in conflict with such rules and regulations.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Patriotic Exercises and Instruction [52720. - 52730.]

52720.

In every public elementary school each day during the school year at the beginning of the first regularly scheduled class or activity period at which the majority of the pupils of the school normally begin the schoolday, there shall be conducted appropriate patriotic exercises. The giving of the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America shall satisfy the requirements of this section.

In every public secondary school there shall be conducted daily appropriate patriotic exercises. The giving of the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America shall satisfy such requirement. Such patriotic exercises for secondary schools shall be conducted in accordance with the regulations which shall be adopted by the governing board of the district maintaining the secondary school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

52730.

(a) Providing instruction that promotes understanding the concepts of “pledge,” “allegiance,” “republic,” and “indivisible,” and understanding the importance of the pledge as an expression of patriotism, love of country, and pride in the United States of America shall satisfy the requirement of Section 52720.

(b) When pupils in a public school are instructed with regard to the words of the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America as part of the patriotic exercises conducted pursuant to this article, that public school shall provide a combination of the giving of the Pledge of Allegiance to the Flag of the United States of America and the instruction specified in subdivision (a). School districts shall provide this instruction during the time allotted for the patriotic exercise.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 523, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Educational Films or Video Tapes [52740. - 52743.]

52740.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to provide accurate instructional materials to schools on all of the following topics:

(1) The internment in the United States of persons of Japanese origin and its impact on Japanese American citizens.

(2) The Armenian genocide.

(3) The World War II internment, relocation, and restriction in the United States of persons of Italian origin and its impact on the Italian American community.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that there are few films or video recordings available on the subjects
 of the internment of persons of Japanese origin, the Armenian genocide, and the World War II internment, relocation, and restriction of persons of Italian origin for teachers to use when teaching pupils about these three devastating events. The shortage of available films or video recordings on these subjects is especially true for the Armenian genocide.

(c) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that films and video recordings giving a historically accurate depiction of the internment in the United States of persons of Japanese origin during World War II, the Armenian genocide, and the World War II internment, relocation, and restriction of persons of Italian origin should be made in order that pupils will recognize these events for the horror they represented. The Legislature hereby encourages teachers to use these films and video recordings as a resource in teaching pupils about these three important historical events that are commonly
 overlooked in today’s school curriculum.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 25.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

52742.

The films or video recordings produced pursuant to this article shall be submitted to the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission for its review, and may be made available to schools, as provided by this article, only upon adoption by the Curriculum Development and Supplemental Materials Commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 26.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

52743.

The State Department of Education shall make available the films or video recordings produced pursuant to this article to schools.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 88, Sec. 27.   (AB 176)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Pupil Survey of Instruction [52760. - 52760.]

52760.

(a) The student government of a school maintaining any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, may establish a committee of pupils and teachers to develop a survey by which pupils may provide feedback to teachers for the purpose of fostering improved communication between pupils and teachers and improving individual classes and teaching methods for future generations of pupils. The survey developed by the committee shall solicit pupil opinion on different aspects of a class and the effectiveness of the teacher of the class. The committee annually may revise the survey.

(b) The administration of the survey and the survey results shall conform to all of the following requirements:

(1) Teachers annually shall be provided the survey and may survey the pupils in the classes they teach.

(2) Survey responses shall be confidential and shall be made known only to the teacher whose class is surveyed.

(3) No administrator or any other school or district official shall view or have access to any survey responses without the express written consent of the teacher to whom the survey relates.

(4) Survey responses shall not become part of a teacher’s personnel record.

(5) The survey and any responses shall not be used for collective bargaining purposes.

(6) The survey responses shall not be included in, nor shall they be used to influence the existing teacher evaluation process, if any, in a school or district in which the survey is conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (SB 1422)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. College and Career Fairs [52770. - 52770.]

52770.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Career fair” means an event where multiple private businesses, governmental agencies, university representatives, or career technical school representatives are invited by a local educational agency to present career options or career technical education options to pupils.

(2) “College fair” means an event where multiple college or university representatives are invited by a local educational agency to present college options to pupils.

(3) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(b) (1) A local educational agency serving pupils in any of grades 9 to 12, inclusive, that is planning to hold a college or career fair shall notify each community college district that has overlapping jurisdiction with the local educational agency of the college or career fair and provide an opportunity for the community college district to participate in the college or career fair.

(2) A notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include both of the following:

(A) The planned date and time of the college or career fair.

(B) The planned location of the college or career fair.

(3) A notice provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be delivered to the community
 college district before the planned date of the college or career fair either by first-class mail or by email.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 23, Sec. 1.   (AB 1173)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12.5. International Baccalaureate Diploma Program [52920. - 52922.]

52920.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program is a comprehensive and rigorous two-year curriculum, leading to examinations for high school pupils. Its objectives are to provide pupils with a balanced education, to facilitate geographic and cultural mobility, and to promote international understanding through a shared academic experience. Successful International Baccalaureate Diploma candidates pursue a specific, intensive, balanced liberal arts course of study and must pass rigorous examinations in seven curricula areas. Successful International Baccalaureate Diploma candidates are typically granted substantial advanced placement credit at the finest colleges and universities in the nation. The academic content and rigor of the instruction and examinations in International
 Baccalaureate Diploma Programs is governed and continuously monitored by the International Baccalaureate Organization in Geneva, Switzerland.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage high schools to offer the intensive, rigorous course of instruction leading to International Baccalaureate Diplomas and to encourage pupils in these schools to enroll in, attempt, and pass the rigorous International Baccalaureate Diploma course of study and the rigorous examinations leading to the International Baccalaureate Diploma.

(c) The Superintendent shall annually update information on the International Baccalaureate Diploma Program available on the department’s Internet Web site. The Superintendent also shall provide support to high schools that offer International Baccalaureate (IB) courses to facilitate communication with the Academic Senate for the California Community Colleges,
 the Academic Senate of the California State University, and the Academic Senate of the University of California about the rigor of those courses and to ensure that college credit is given to pupils who participate so that they benefit from successful efforts in IB programs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 40.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

52922.

A school district that offers an International Baccalaureate Diploma Program may help pay the test fees for pupils in need of financial assistance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 538, Sec. 42.   (SB 416)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Science and Technology Education Improvement Programs [52950. - 52965.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Declarations, and Statewide Goals [52950. - 52951.]

52950.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that improved science education in elementary and secondary schools contributes to improvements in student performance. The Legislature further finds that the California Writing Project and the California Mathematics Project are exemplary training programs which were established to improve student competence in writing and mathematics through effective in-service education and training programs for teachers in these subject areas. The Legislature recognizes that the California writing and math projects provide effective models which could be utilized in providing staff development for teachers in science.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the Regents of the University of California consider establishing the California Science Project, to be administered jointly by the Regents of the University of California and the Trustees of the California State University in cooperation with the State Department of Education. The purpose of this project shall be to provide in-service education to elementary and secondary teachers in public schools.

It is also the intent of the Legislature that projects be distributed throughout the state so that elementary and secondary school personnel located in rural, urban, and suburban areas may benefit from the in-service education opportunities. It is further the intent of the Legislature that participating school districts, colleges, and universities coordinate these projects with staff development programs and activities currently administered by the State Department of Education, including, but not limited to, teacher education and computer centers established in the same geographic area. It is further the intent of the Legislature that the scientists in the community be contacted in order to determine their interest in participating in the projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

52951.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) California is a national and international leader in scientific and technological development. California employs 45 percent of the nation’s computer specialists and 21 percent of its engineers. The economic growth of California and the nation will depend in a large part upon its ability to remain competitive with other states and with foreign nations. Maintaining our preeminence will be dependent upon persons who have a solid foundation in science.

(b) There is growing concern about science illiteracy within the state’s adult population. A National Science Foundation Report shows that less than half of all high school juniors and one-third of high school seniors take a science course. As a result, American high school students receive only one-half to one-third the exposure to science as their counterparts in other developed countries, such as Japan, West Germany, East Germany, and the Soviet Union.

(c) California has an insufficient number of teachers trained in science and mathematics. There were 1,400 positions filled by teachers not trained in science or mathematics in 1985, and there is a projected shortage of 2,000 to 2,500 positions being filled by teachers not trained in science and mathematics in 1986. 

(d) Due to the higher entry level salaries provided by the private sector for college graduates trained in science and mathematics, the growing shortage of qualified science and mathematics teachers will continue.

(e) There are exemplary programs in California that upgrade the training of science teachers and train science teachers.

(f) Complex problems must be overcome if science education is to advance students to a level of competence appropriate for an increasingly technological society. The decline in science achievement of students in schools, colleges, and universities in California affects all students, but is particularly acute for women students, minority students, and students from lower income groups. The problems related to this situation include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) A lack of understanding of the fundamental principles of science and their implications for everyday life.

(2) Inadequate mastery of knowledge of science by students and many teachers, resulting in poor comprehension of college coursework and high attrition rates for those students who have these deficiencies.

(3) A tendency among girls and young women to avoid taking science courses in high school, which limits their choice of educational options, and screens them out of future careers in science, engineering, and other science-related professions.

(4) Lack of science instruction at the elementary school level to enable all students, including female, minority, and low-income students, to develop skills and attitudes which will enable and encourage them to pursue science successfully in later grades.

(5) A critical shortage of qualified teachers, with significant numbers of science teachers leaving the classroom for nonteaching jobs, and few students training to take their places.

(6) Lack of teachers’ training in the use of laboratory equipment and procedures, as well as the lack of laboratory-based facilities in schools, thereby reducing the opportunity for students to receive “hands-on” science instruction.

(7) Staffing of more than 25 percent of science classes by teachers not certified to teach science.

(g) While some colleges and universities are improving courses in the teaching of science, this will not fully address the problem, since the number of new teacher candidates is relatively small. Therefore, the Legislature recognizes the need to assist existing teachers in gaining the knowledge necessary to improve science education for all students.

(h) The science problem is shared by all segments and levels of California education, and the problem can best be addressed by cooperatively planned and funded efforts.

(i) Appropriate models for cooperative, intersegmental approaches to solving the science problem should address the findings of state and national science associations, including, but not limited to, the National Science Foundation and National Association of Science Teachers. The comprehensive approach will give special attention to providing in-service training of classroom teachers, defining more clearly those standards of science knowledge required at each school level, and developing curricula and instructional strategies to meet these standards. Whenever possible, existing resources shall be pooled to support this comprehensive program. Models for the program may include the California Writing Project; the California Mathematics Project; the EQUALS Project; the MESA Project; the University of California at Irvine’s Summer Science Institute; the Lawrence Hall of Science’s Programs for Schools; and the Lawrence Livermore Laboratory’s Science Education Center, Summer Science Institute, and Lesson In-service Science Workshop for Elementary and Middle School Teachers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Science Project [52955. - 52965.]

52955.

With funds appropriated therefor, the University of California, upon approval by the regents, shall establish a cooperative endeavor entitled the California Science Project, to be administered jointly with the Trustees of the California State University in cooperation with the State Department of Education. Science projects shall be distributed throughout the state so that public elementary, secondary, and postsecondary school personnel located in rural, urban, and suburban areas may avail themselves of science education. “Project,” as used in this chapter, means the California Science Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52956.

The project shall establish an advisory committee to recommend proposals to be funded and criteria for project evaluation. The advisory committee shall evaluate the progress of the project and recommend appropriate changes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1486, Sec. 1.   Operative July 8, 1988, by Sec. 2 of Ch. 1486.)
-------------------------------------------

52957.

The advisory committee shall include:

(a) One representative selected by the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(b) Two representatives selected by the President of the University of California, one of whom has the responsibility for teaching science.

(c) Two representatives selected by the Chancellor of the California State University, one of whom has the responsibility for teaching science.

(d) Two representatives selected by the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, one of whom has the responsibility for teaching science.

(e) Four public school classroom teachers of science, and one additional representative, selected by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(f) One teacher of science plus a representative selected by the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.
